Illinois, session 104th, HB3764.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Highway Code is amended by 5changing Section 4-510 as follows: 6    (605 ILCS 5/4-510)  (from Ch. 121, par. 4-510)7    Sec. 4-510. The Department may establish presently the 8approximate locations and widths of rights of way for future 9additions to the State highway system to inform the public and 10prevent costly and conflicting development of the land 11involved. 12    The Department shall hold a public hearing whenever 13approximate locations and widths of rights of way for future 14highway additions are to be established. The hearing shall be 15held in or near the county or counties where the land to be 16used is located and notice of the hearing shall be published in 17a newspaper or newspapers of general circulation in the county 18or counties involved. Any interested person or his 19representative may be heard. The Department shall evaluate the 20testimony given at the hearing. 21    The Department shall make a survey and prepare a map 22showing the location and approximate widths of the rights of 23way needed for future additions to the highway system. The map   HB3764- 2 -LRB104 10097 LNS 20169 b1shall show existing highways in the area involved and the 2property lines and owners of record of all land that will be 3needed for the future additions and all other pertinent 4information. Approval of the map with any changes resulting 5from the hearing shall be indicated in the record of the 6hearing and a notice of the approval and a copy of the map 7shall be filed in the office of the recorder for all counties 8in which the land needed for future additions is located. 9    Public notice of the approval and filing shall be given in 10newspapers of general circulation in all counties where the 11land is located and shall be served by registered mail within 1260 days thereafter on all owners of record of the land needed 13for future additions. 14    The Department may approve changes in the map from time to 15time. The changes shall be filed and notice given in the manner 16provided for an original map. 17    After the map is filed and notice thereof given to the 18owners of record of the land needed for future additions, no 19one shall incur development costs or place improvements in, 20upon or under the land involved nor rebuild, alter or add to 21any existing structure without first giving 60 days notice by 22registered mail to the Department. This prohibition shall not 23apply to any normal or emergency repairs to existing 24structures or if the Department has not held its mandated 25public hearing outlined in this Section. The Department shall 26have 45 days after receipt of that notice to inform the owner   HB3764- 3 -LRB104 10097 LNS 20169 b1of the Department's intention to acquire the land involved; 2after which, it shall have the additional time of 120 days to 3acquire such land by purchase or to initiate action to acquire 4said land through the exercise of the right of eminent domain. 5When the right of way is acquired by the State no damages shall 6be allowed for any construction, alteration or addition in 7violation of this Section unless the Department has failed to 8acquire the land by purchase or has abandoned an eminent 9domain proceeding initiated pursuant to the provisions of this 10paragraph. 11    Any right of way needed for additions to the highway 12system may be acquired at any time by the State or by the 13county or municipality in which it is located. The time of 14determination of the value of the property to be taken under 15this Section for additions to the highway system shall be the 16date of the actual taking, if the property is acquired by 17purchase, or the date of the filing of a complaint for 18condemnation, if the property is acquired through the exercise 19of the right of eminent domain, rather than the date when the 20map of the proposed right-of-way was filed of record. The rate 21of compensation to be paid for farm land acquired hereunder by 22the exercise of the right of eminent domain shall be in 23accordance with Section 4-501 of this Code. 24    Not more than 10 years after a protected corridor is 25established under this Section regardless of whether the 26corridor is established before or after the effective date of   HB3764- 4 -LRB104 10097 LNS 20169 b1this amendatory Act of the 97th General Assembly, and not 2later than the expiration of each succeeding 10 year period, 3the Department shall hold public hearings to discuss the 4viability and feasibility of the protected corridor. In the 5case of a protected corridor established prior to 10 years 6before the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 97th 7General Assembly, the hearing shall be conducted within 6 8months of the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 97th 9General Assembly. The Department shall retain the discretion 10to maintain any protected corridor established under this 11Section, but shall give due consideration to the information 12obtained at the hearing and, if the Department does not hold a 13public hearing, as proscribed in this paragraph, or in its 14discretion determines that construction of the roadway is no 15longer feasible, the Department shall abolish the protected 16corridor shall be abolished. 17(Source: P.A. 97-279, eff. 8-8-11.)